Utah statutes.
49-17-501.   Death benefit for members before retirement -- Computation.

(1)  Upon the receipt of acceptable proof of death of a member before the member's retirement date, the member's spouse at the time of death shall have the choice of the following death benefits:

(a)  a refund of the member's member contributions, including refund interest, plus 65% of the member's most recent 12 months' compensation prior to death; or

(b)  an allowance equal to 65% of the allowance computed in accordance with Section 49-17-402, but disregarding early retirement reductions.

(2)  If there is no spouse to whom the member is married at the time of death, member contributions, including refund interest, shall be refunded to a beneficiary, in accordance with Sections 49-11-609 and 49-11-610.

(3) (a)  A spouse who requests a benefit under this section shall apply in writing to the office.

(b)  The allowance shall begin on the first day of the month:

(i)  following the month in which the member died, if the application is received by the office within 90 days of the member's death; or

(ii)  following the month in which the application is received by the office, if the application is received by the office more than 90 days after the member's death.



Amended by Chapter 439, 2011 General Session

